Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [221.0311] TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY ACCESSIBILITY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the definitions in section 65B.472, subdivision 1, apply. new text end new text begin (b) "Wheelchair accessible vehicle" means a vehicle equipped with a ramp or lift capable of transporting nonfolding motorized wheelchairs, mobility scooters, or other mobility devices. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Wheelchair accessibility surcharge. new text end new text begin (a) Transportation network companies must pay to the commissioner a 15-cent surcharge per ride that is not accessible to wheelchair users originating in Minnesota. The surcharge must be paid monthly. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must deposit all surcharges collected under this subdivision into the wheelchair accessible vehicle services account established under section 221.0312. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Digital network accessibility. new text end new text begin A transportation network company's digital network must be accessible to individuals with disabilities by January 1, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Equity data report. new text end new text begin (a) By October 1 each year, all transportation network companies must report to the commissioner and the Minnesota Council on Disability about the accessibility of services provided in the previous year to individuals with disabilities in each community served. At a minimum, the report must include the: new text end new text begin (1) estimated time of arrival for wheelchair accessible vehicles; new text end new text begin (2) total number of wheelchair accessible vehicles requested; new text end new text begin (3) total number of rides fulfilled in wheelchair accessible vehicles; new text end new text begin (4) total number of wheelchair accessible rides that were denied; new text end new text begin (5) total number of requested wheelchair accessible rides that were referred to a third party; and new text end new text begin (6) programs and best practices the transportation network company has implemented to improve the accessibility of service to individuals with disabilities. new text end new text begin (b) All data required in the report must be capable of aggregation by city so that useful comparisons can be made. new text end new text begin (c) Upon review of the report, if the commissioner concludes that transportation network companies are not collectively having a positive impact on services provided to individuals with disabilities, the commissioner may impose a fine up to $15,000 on each transportation network company. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Nondiscrimination policy. new text end new text begin All transportation network companies must adopt a nondiscrimination policy that is available on a publicly accessible website. The website must provide notice of the policy and procedures to report a complaint to the Department of Human Rights about a driver's alleged violation of the policy. The policy must include the following: new text end new text begin (1) the transportation network company must take reasonable steps to ensure services provided by drivers using the digital network are offered in a nondiscriminatory manner; new text end new text begin (2) the transportation network company must not unlawfully discriminate against a prospective passenger or unlawfully refuse to provide service to a protected class of passengers or certain localities; new text end new text begin (3) meaningful penalties, such as lost tips, reduced hours, suspension, or termination, for drivers who deny services to a prospective passenger due to the passenger belonging to a protected class; new text end new text begin (4) drivers must not refuse services to a prospective passenger with a service animal; new text end new text begin (5) the transportation network company must not charge an individual with a disability an additional fee, including for the transport of a service animal, because of the individual's disabilities; new text end new text begin (6) the transportation network company must provide on its digital network a way for passengers with disabilities to request a wheelchair accessible vehicle; new text end new text begin (7) the transportation network company must facilitate transportation for passengers requiring a wheelchair accessible vehicle by: new text end new text begin (i) connecting the passenger to a driver of a wheelchair accessible vehicle in the network; or new text end new text begin (ii) directing the passenger to an alternate provider with the authority and ability to dispatch a wheelchair accessible vehicle; new text end new text begin (8) if a passenger with a disability requires the use of a wheelchair, assistive technology, or other mobility device, the driver must store and transport the equipment if reasonably able to do so. If the driver is unable to reasonably store and transport the equipment, the driver must refer the passenger to another driver or service provider with a vehicle able to accommodate the equipment; new text end new text begin (9) drivers must allow wheelchair users the choice to independently transfer from their wheelchairs to the wheelchair accessible vehicle if they are able to do so; new text end new text begin (10) when a ride is requested over the digital network, the total fare, fare range, or rate by distance or time must be displayed before the ride is confirmed. Any variables that may result in higher rates or fares, including tips, wait time, demand pricing, or any other surcharges or fees, must also be displayed; new text end new text begin (11) passengers may opt out of being rated by the driver; new text end new text begin (12) the transportation network company must not charge a fee if a passenger cancels a ride because the vehicle is unsuitable for the passenger's disability needs; new text end new text begin (13) the transportation network company must not charge an additional fee for a personal companion, orderly, or any other care assistant accompanying a passenger with a disability on a ride; new text end new text begin (14) the transportation network company must not impose a minimum charge when a driver is unable to locate a passenger; and new text end new text begin (15) the transportation network company must allow a passenger to contact a driver over the digital network or telephone after a ride is confirmed. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [221.0312] WHEELCHAIR ACCESSIBLE VEHICLE SERVICES ACCOUNT; GRANTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Wheelchair accessible vehicle services account established. new text end new text begin A wheelchair accessible vehicle services account is created in the special revenue fund. The account consists of money allotted, appropriated, deposited in, or transferred to the account. Money in the account is appropriated to the commissioner and distributed as provided in subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Minimum collections. new text end new text begin If the commissioner does not collect a minimum of $850,000 per year from transportation network companies and taxicab companies under section 221.0311, subdivision 2, for the wheelchair accessible vehicle services account, then the amount sufficient to reach the minimum collection threshold is annually transferred from the general fund to the wheelchair accessible vehicle services account. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Grant eligibility. new text end new text begin (a) A taxicab company that maintains at least ten percent of its active fleet as wheelchair accessible vehicles or an independent contractor of a transportation network company who provides a service record of at least six months with that company is eligible for grants under subdivision 4. A grant under subdivision 4 may be used to meet the ten percent threshold. new text end new text begin (b) Operators of vehicles and grantees must complete ....... hours of disability training to be eligible to receive grants under subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (c) Drivers of leased vehicles are not eligible for grants related to the cost and maintenance of a wheelchair accessible vehicle. new text end new text begin (d) For purposes of this subdivision, "active fleet" means the total number of vehicles registered with the transportation network company or taxicab company capable of providing rides. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Grants. new text end new text begin The commissioner must award grants using the funds in the wheelchair accessible vehicle services account to taxicab companies or independent contractors of transportation network companies: new text end new text begin (1) to purchase wheelchair accessible vehicles or modify existing vehicles so they are accessible, up to $7,500 per purchased or modified vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) for maintenance or equipment expenses related to ramps, axles, brakes, or transmissions on wheelchair accessible vehicles in their fleet, up to $3,500 per vehicle; new text end new text begin (3) for drivers who provide wheelchair accessible rides, up to $20 per ride fulfilled; and new text end new text begin (4) for drivers who provide wheelchair accessible rides for a shift exceeding four hours, up to $15 per shift. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 221.091, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Small vehicle passenger service. (a) A statutory or home rule charter city that licenses and regulates small vehicle passenger service must do so by ordinance. The ordinance must, at a minimum, provide for driver qualifications, insurance, vehicle safety, and periodic vehicle inspections. new text begin (b) A statutory or home rule charter city may waive any license fees of a transportation network company or taxicab company that maintains ten percent of its active fleet as wheelchair accessible vehicles. For purposes of this paragraph, a "transportation network company" has the meaning given in section 65B.472, subdivision 1. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end A statutory or home rule charter city that has adopted an ordinance complying with this subdivision may enforce the registration requirement in section 221.021. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end A statutory or home rule charter city that regulates, by ordinance, pedicabs, rickshaws, or other similar vehicles used for passenger service may permit authorized vehicles to be equipped with an electric motor that meets the requirements for an electric-assisted bicycle under section 169.011, subdivision 27, clause (3).